Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5437YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2094 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ STATE 1 MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE INPATIENT PSYCHIATRIC BEDS. By July 1, 2 2027, the department of health and human services shall, at a 3 minimum, double the number of inpatient psychiatric beds based 4 on the number of inpatient psychiatric beds that were at each 5 state mental health institute on June 30, 2025. No later than 6 October 1, 2026, the department of health and human services 7 shall apply to the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services 8 of the United States department of health and human services 9 for a waiver of Medicaidâs institution for mental diseases 10 exclusion. 11